Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.190

Purchase contract process—Other than formal sealed bidding.

(1) This section provides a uniform process to award contracts for the purchase of any materials, equipment, supplies, or services by those municipalities that are authorized to use this process in lieu of the requirements for formal sealed bidding. The state statutes governing a specific type of municipality shall establish the maximum dollar thresholds of the contracts that can be awarded under this process, and may include other matters concerning the awarding of contracts for purchases, for the municipality.

(2) At least twice per year, the municipality shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice of the existence of vendor lists and solicit the names of vendors for the lists. Municipalities shall by resolution establish a procedure for securing telephone or written quotations, or both, from at least three different vendors whenever possible to assure that a competitive price is established and for awarding the contracts for the purchase of any materials, equipment, supplies, or services to the lowest responsible bidder as defined in chapter 39.26 RCW. Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and shall be available by telephone inquiry. A contract awarded pursuant to this section need not be advertised.

[ 2015 c 79 s 4; 1993 c 198 s 2; 1991 c 363 s 110.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.